nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Benodigdheden voor vissen en water: Leidingen voor aquariums en vijvers; Beluchtingssteen voor aquariums; Schoonmaakbenodigdheden voor aquariums; Decoraties voor aquariums; Aquariumfilters; Visnetten voor aquariums; Kiezels en voedingsbodem voor aquaria; Aquariumverlichting; Overloopbakken voor aquariums; Aquariummeubels; Temperatuurregelaars voor aquariums; Behandeling van aquariumwater; Aquariums; Kunstmest voor waterplanten; Voedseldispensers voor vissen; Visvoer
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Artigos aquáticos e para peixes: Aquários e tubos para tanques; Difusores e pedra do ar para aquários; Artigos de limpeza para aquários; Decorações para aquário; Filtros para aquários; Redes para aquários; Substratos e cascalho para aquários; Iluminação para aquários; Caixas de sobrefluxo para aquários; Suportes para aquários; Controladores de temperatura para aquários; Tratamentos de água para aquários; Aquários; Fertilizadores de plantas aquáticas; Comedouros para peixes; Comida para peixes
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 어류/수족관 용품: 수족관/연못 튜브; 수족관 에어스톤/디퓨저; 수족관 청소 용품; 수족관 장식 용품; 수족관 필터; 수족관 어망; 수족관 자갈/바닥재; 수족관 조명; 수족관 오버플로 박스; 수족관 스탠드; 수족관 온도 조절기; 수족관 정수 약품; 수족관; 수중 식물 비료; 물고기 자동 급식기; 물고기 먹이
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Fiske- og vannutstyr: Rør til akvarier og dammer; Luftstener og diffusere til akvarier; Rengjøringsprodukter for akvarier; Akvariedekor; Akvariefiltre; Fiskenett til akvarier; Sten og substrater til akvarier; Akvariebelysning; Overvannsbokser til akvarier; Akvariestativer; Temperaturkontrollere for akvarier; Vannbehandling for akvarier; Akvarier; Gjødsel for vannplanter; Fiskefôrere; Fiskefôr
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Poissons et fournitures aquatiques: Tuyaux pour bassin et aquariums; Diffuseurs et pierres à air pour aquariums; Accessoires de nettoyage pour aquarium; Décorations d’aquariums; Filtres pour aquariums; Épuisettes pour aquariums; Gravier et substrats pour aquariums; Éclairage pour aquariums; Colonnes de débordement pour aquariums; Supports pour aquariums; Commandes de température pour aquariums; Produits d’entretien pour aquariums; Aquariums; Engrais pour plantes aquatiques; Distributeurs de nourriture pour poissons; Nourriture pour poissons
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Fish & Aquatic Supplies: Aquarium & Pond Tubings; Aquarium Air Stones & Diffusers; Aquarium Cleaning Supplies; Aquarium Decors; Aquarium Filters; Aquarium Fish Nets; Aquarium Gravel & Substrates; Aquarium Lighting; Aquarium Overflow Boxes; Aquarium Stands; Aquarium Temperature Controllers; Aquarium Water Treatments; Aquariums; Aquatic Plant Fertilizers; Fish Feeders; Fish Food
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Zierfisch- Aquarien- und Teichbedarf: Schläuche & Rohre für Aquarien und Teiche; Ausströmersteine & Diffusoren für Aquarien; Zubehör für Aquariumreinigung; Aquariumdekoration; Aquariumfilter; Fischnetze für Aquarien; Bodengrund für Aquarien; Aquariumbeleuchtung; Überlaufkästen; Aquariumständer; Temperaturregler für Aquarien; Wasseraufbereitungsgeräte; Aquarien; Wasserpflanzendünger; Fischfutterautomaten; Fischfutter
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 魚和水族用品: 水族箱和水池用管路; 水族箱氣泡石/散氣條; 水族箱清理用品; 水族箱造景飾品; 水族箱過濾器; 水族箱漁網; 水族箱底砂; 水族箱照明; 水族箱溢流盒; 水族箱支架; 水族箱溫控器; 水族箱水處理設備; 水族箱/魚缸; 水生植物專用肥料; 魚飼料自動餵食器; 魚飼料
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для рыб и аквариумов: Трубки и шланги для аквариумов и прудов; Распылители-камни и диффузоры для аквариума; Товары для чистки аквариумов; Товары для декорирования аквариумов; Фильтры для аквариумов; Сачки для аквариумов; Гравий и грунт для аквариумов; Освещение аквариумов; Переливные колонки для аквариумов; Подставки и тумбы для аквариумов; Терморегуляторы для аквариумов; Аквариумная химия; Аквариумы; Удобрения для водорослей; Кормушки для рыб; Корм для рыб
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Риби и артикули за акваристика: Тръби за аквариуми и изкуствени езера; Камъни за кислород и дифузери; Консумативи за почистване на аквариум; Декорации за аквариуми; Филтри за аквариум; Кепчета за аквариумни рибки; Чакъл и субстрати за аквариум; Аквариумно осветление; Преливни кутии за аквариум; Стойки за аквариум; Устройства за управление на температурата за аквариуми; Препарати за обработка на водата; Аквариуми; Торове за аквариумни растения; Хранилки за риби; Храна за риби
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre rybička a akváriá: Hadičky do akvárií a jazierok; Akvarijné vzduchovacie kamene a difúzory; Potreby na čistenie akvárií; Dekorácie v akváriu; Filtre do akvária; Sieťky na akváriové ryby; Akváriový štrk a substráty; Osvetlenie akvária; Akváriové odpeňovače; Stojany na akvária; Ovládače teploty v akváriu; Postupy ošetrenia vody v akváriu; Akváriá; Hnojivá pre vodné rastliny; Kŕmidlá pre ryby; Krmivo pre ryby
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės žuvims ir kitiems vandens gyvūnams: Akvariumų ir tvenkinių vamzdžiai; Akvariumų „oro akmenys“ ir difuzoriai; Akvariumų valymo reikmenys; Akvariumų papuošimai; Akvariumų filtrai; Tinkleliai akvariuminėms žuvims; Akvariumų žvirgždas ir substratai; Akvariumų apšvietimas; Akvariumų perpildymo dėžutės; Akvariumų stovai; Akvariumų temperatūros reguliatoriai; Akvariumų vandens priedai; Akvariumai; Vandens augalų trąšos; Žuvų šėryklos; Žuvų maistas
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru pești și acvaristică: Tuburi pentru acvariu și iaz; Pietre și difuzoare de aer pentru acvariu; Materiale de curățare pentru acvariu; Decor pentru acvariu; Filtre pentru acvariu; Plase pentru pești de acvariu; Pietriș și substraturi pentru acvariu; Iluminat pentru acvariu; Recipiente de preaplin pentru acvariu; Standuri pentru acvariu; Regulatoare de temperatură pentru acvariu; Tratamente pentru apă pentru acvariu; Acvarii; Îngrășăminte pentru plante acvatice; Dispozitive pentru hrănirea peștilor; Hrană pentru pești
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 鱼类和水族用品: 水族箱/鱼缸管材; 水族馆气泡石/空气扩散器; 水族箱清洁用品; 水族馆装饰; 水族箱过滤器; 水族馆渔网; 水族箱沙砾/铺垫物; 水族箱照明; 水族箱溢流盒; 水族箱支架; 水族箱温度控制器; 水族箱水净化/调节剂; 水族箱/鱼缸; 水生植物肥料; 喂鱼器; 鱼食
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Balık ve Su Malzemeleri: Akvaryum ve Gölet Boruları; Akvaryum Hava Taşları ve Difüzörleri; Akvaryum Temizleme Gereçleri; Akvaryum Dekorları; Akvaryum Filtreleri; Akvaryum Balık Ağları; Akvaryum Taş ve Substratları; Akvaryum Işıklandırmaları; Akvaryum Taşma Hazneleri; Akvaryum Stantları; Akvaryum Sıcaklık Denetleme Aygıtları; Akvaryum Su Arıtıcıları; Akvaryumlar; Su Bitkisi Gübreleri; Balık Yemlikleri; Balık Yemleri
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły i akcesoria dla rybek: Rurki do akwariów i oczek wodnych; Kamienie napowietrzające i dyfuzory; Narzędzia i środki do czyszczenia akwariów; Ozdoby akwariowe; Filtry akwariowe; Podbieraki akwarystyczne; Żwirek i podłoża akwariowe; Oświetlenie do akwariów; Pudełka przelewowe do akwariów; Szafki pod akwaria; Regulatory temperatury do akwariów; Preparaty do wody w akwariach; Akwaria; Nawozy do roślin akwariowych; Karmniki dla rybek; Pokarm dla rybek
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Peixes e suprimentos aquáticos: Tubos para aquários e tanques; Difusores e pedras de ar para aquários; Suprimentos para limpeza de aquários; Decorações para aquários; Filtros para aquário; Redes de peixe para aquários; Cascalho e substratos para aquário; Iluminação para aquário; Caixas de overflow para aquários; Suportes para aquário; Controladores de temperatura de aquários; Tratamentos para água de aquário; Aquários; Fertilizantes para plantas aquáticas; Alimentadores para peixes; Ração para peixes
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์ทางน้ำและปลา: ท่อสำหรับตู้ปลาและบ่อน้ำ; หินเพิ่มอากาศและตัวควบคุมอากาศสำหรับตู้ปลา; อุปกรณ์ทำความสะอาดตู้ปลา; อุปกรณ์ตกแต่งตู้ปลา; ตัวกรองสำหรับตู้ปลา; สวิงช้อนปลา; กรวดและวัสดุรองพื้นตู้ปลา; ไฟสำหรับตู้ปลา; กล่องกรองตู้ปลา; ที่ตั้งตู้ปลา; ตัวควบคุมอุณหภูมิตู้ปลา; การดูแลรักษาน้ำในตู้ปลา; ตู้ปลา; ปุ๋ยสำหรับพืชน้ำ; อุปกรณ์ป้อนอาหารปลา; อาหารปลา
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Fisk och vattentillbehör: Akvarium och dammrör; Syrestenar och diffusorer till akvarium; Akvarierengöring; Akvariedekorationer; Akvariefilter; Akvarienät; Sand och stenar till akvarier; Akvarielampor; Uppsamlingslådor för akvarier; Akvarieställ; Akarietermometer; Vattenbehandlingar för akvarier; Akvarier; Gödningsmedel för akvarieväxter; Fiskmatare; Fiskmat
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Fisk og vandforsyninger: Slanger til akvarier og havebassiner; Luftsten og luftdiffusere til akvarier; Rengøringsmaterialer til akvarier; Pynt til akvarium; Filtre til akvarium; Fiskenet til akvarier; Bundlag og substrat til akvarium; Lamper til akvarium; Overløbskasser til akvarium; Standere til akvarium; Temperaturregulatorer til akvarier; Vandbehandling til akvarium; Akvarier; Gødning til akvarieplanter; Foderautomater til fisk; Fiskefoder
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για ψάρια & υδρόβια ζώα: Σωληνώσεις ενυδρείων και λιμνών; Πέτρες αέρα και διαχυτές ενυδρείου; Προμήθειες καθαρισμού ενυδρείων; Διακοσμητικά ενυδρείων; Φίλτρα ενυδρείου; Δίχτυα ψαριών ενυδρείου; Χαλίκι & υποστρώματα ενυδρείου; Φωτισμός Ενυδρείου; Κουτιά υπερχείλισης ενυδρείου; Βάσεις ενυδρείου; Ελεγκτές θερμοκρασίας ενυδρείου; Επεξεργασίες νερού ενυδρείου; Ενυδρεία; Λιπάσματα υδρόβιων φυτών; Ταΐστρες ψαριών; Τροφή ψαριών
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Forniture ittiche e acquatiche: Tubi per stagni e acquari; Aeratori e pietre porose per acquari; Articoli per pulizia acquari; Decorazioni per acquari; Filtri per acquari; Retini per acquari; Ghiaia e substrati per acquari; Illuminazione per acquari; Sistemi di tracimazione per acquari; Supporti per acquari; Termostati per acquari; Prodotti trattamento acqua degli acquari; Acquari; Fertilizzanti per piante acquatiche; Distributori cibo per pesci; Mangime per pesci
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho cá & động vật thủy sinh: Hệ thống ống bể thủy sinh & ao nuôi cá; Máy sục khí & khuếch tán bể thủy sinh; Dụng cụ làm sạch bể cá; Đồ trang trí bể cá; Thiết bị lọc bể cá; Lưới bắt cá; Sỏi và lớp lót bể cá; Thiết bị chiếu sáng bể cá; Hộp lọc tràn bể cá; Kệ để bể cá; Bộ kiểm soát nhiệt độ bể cá; Sản phẩm xử lý nước bể cá; Bể cá; Phân bón cho cây thủy sinh; Máy cho cá ăn; Thức ăn cho cá
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Kala- ja akvaariotarvikkeet: Akvaario- ja allasletkut; Akvaarion ilmakivet ja diffuusorit; Akvaarion puhdistustarvikkeet; Akvaarion koristeet; Akvaarion suodattimet; Akvaarion kalahaavit; Akvaariosora ja pohjamateriaalit; Akvaarion valaistus; Akvaarion ylivuotolaatikot; Akvaariojalustat; Akvaarion lämmönsäätimet; Akvaariovedenhoito; Akvaariot; Akvaariokasvien ravinteet; Kalojen ruokinta-automaatit; Kalanruoka
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Suministros para peces y acuarios: Tuberías para acuarios y estanques; Difusores y bombas de aire para acuarios; Productos de limpieza de acuarios; Decoraciones para acuarios; Filtros para acuarios; Redes para acuarios; Sustratos y arena para acuarios; Iluminación para acuarios; Rebosaderos para acuarios; Bases para acuarios; Controladores de temperatura de acuarios; Tratamientos del agua de acuarios; Acuarios; Fertilizantes para plantas acuáticas; Comederos para peces; Alimento para peces
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Hal- és vízi kellékek: Akvárium- és tócsövek; Akváriumi levegőkövek és diffúzorok; Akváriumtisztító-szerek; Akváriumdekorációk; Akváriumszűrők; Akváriumi halhálók; Akváriumi kavics és szubsztrátok; Akváriumvilágítás; Akváriumi túlfolyótartályok; Akváriumállványok; Akvárium-hőmérsékletszabályozók; Akváriumi vízkezelések; Akváriumok; Vízinövény-műtrágyák; Haletetők; Haleledel
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > 魚・水産用品: 水槽・池用チューブ; アクアリウム用エアストーン・ディフューザー; 水槽掃除用品; 水槽用小物類; 水槽用フィルター; アクアリウム用魚網; 水槽用底砂・底床材; 水槽用照明器具; オーバーフロー水槽; 水槽スタンド; 水温管理機器; 水槽用水質調整剤; 水槽; 水草肥料; 観賞魚用自動給餌器; 観賞魚用フード
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Potřeby pro ryby a vodní živočichy: Potrubí k akváriím a jezírkům; Vzduchovací kameny a difuzéry pro akvária; Potřeby pro čištění akvárií; Akvarijní dekorace; Filtry do akvárií; Akvarijní síťky; Štěrk a písek do akvária; Akvarijní osvětlení; Nádoby proti přetečení akvária; Podstavce pro akvária; Regulátory teploty pro akvária; Přípravky na úpravu akvarijní vody; Akvária; Hnojiva pro vodní rostliny; Krmítka pro ryby; Krmení pro ryby
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za ribe i vodeni svijet: Crijeva za akvarije i jezerca; Raspršivači i difuzori zraka za akvarij; Sredstva za čišćenje akvarija; Uređenje akvarija; Filtri za akvarij; Ribolovne mreže za akvarij; Šljunak i podloge za akvarij; Rasvjeta za akvarij; Preljevne kutije za akvarij; Stalci za akvarij; Regulatori temperature za akvarij; Pročišćivači vode za akvarij; Akvariji; Gnojiva za vodene biljke; Hranilice za ribe; Hrana za ribe
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za ribe in vodne živali: Cevi za akvarije in ribnike; Akvarijski zračni kamni in difuzorji; Pripomočki za čiščenje akvarija; Okraski za akvarije; Filtri za akvarije; Mreže za akvarijske ribe; Prod in substrati za akvarije; Osvetlitev akvarija; Prelivna škatla za akvarije; Stojala za akvarije; Regulatorji temperature v akvariju; Preparati za akvarijsko vodo; Akvariji; Gnojila za vodne rastline; Krmilnice za ribe; Hrana za ribe